Iowa, session 2025-2026, HSB296.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF IOWA: 3 TLSB 2937YC (2) 91 th/ns H.F. _____ Section 1. Section 310.18, Code 2025, is amended to read as 1 follows: 2 310.18 Partial payments during construction. 3 Partial payments may be made on work in progress, but no 4 such partial payment shall not be deemed final acceptance of 5 the work nor a waiver of any defect in the work. The board of 6 supervisors, the county engineer, or the department may approve 7 partial and final claims. Approval may be evidenced by the 8 signature of the county engineer or chairperson of the board 9 or department, or a majority of the members of the board or 10 department, on the individual claims or on the abstract of a 11 number of claims with the individual claims attached to the 12 abstract. 13